Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-993
Reemployment; repay contributions; limitation; effect.

For one year from May 30, 1987, any person who withdrew his or her accumulated contributions pursuant to section 79-992 prior to May 30, 1987, has again become an employee, and has not previously repaid all of his or her accumulated contributions pursuant to such section may elect to repay any unpaid portion of these accumulated contributions to the retirement system for any number of years of creditable service which he or she accumulated prior to withdrawing his or her accumulated contributions. The amount to be repaid shall not exceed the amount of the withdrawal for the years of creditable service for which the repayment is being made plus the regular interest which would have accrued on that amount under the retirement system. Any person who repays such amount shall be restored to the same status for the years of creditable service for which repayment is made as he or she had prior to the withdrawal of the accumulated contributions.

Laws 1987, LB 298, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1049.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 628.